Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.060

Privilege—Exceptions.

The privilege described in RCW 43.382.050 does not apply when:

(1) The ombuds or ombuds' staff member has direct knowledge of an alleged crime, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought is relevant to that allegation;

(2) The ombuds or a member of the ombuds' staff has received a threat of, or becomes aware of a risk of, imminent serious harm to any person, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought is relevant to that threat or risk; or

(3) The ombuds has been asked to provide general information regarding the general operation of, or the general processes employed at, the ombuds' office.

[ 2016 c 172 s 11.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.